California, session 20252026, SB688.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Executive branch rulemaking entities would benefit from a centralized office that drafts regulations on behalf of those entities.(b) The most common reasons that regulations are disapproved by the Office of Administrative Law are clarity and consistency. Having an office of experienced drafting attorneys for regulations will help ensure that those regulations are clear, consistent, and within the scope of rulemaking authority.(c) The personnel and other related costs of establishing the Office of Regulatory Counsel within the Governor’s office pursuant to this act shall be absorbed from existing state resources so that there are no new or additional costs incurred to the state because of this act.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 12100.200) is added to Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 1.7. Office of Regulatory Counsel12100.200. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Office” means the Office of Regulatory Counsel.(b) “Regulation” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 11342.600.12100.201. (a) The Office of Regulatory Counsel is hereby established in state government within the Governor’s office. The office shall be under the direction and control of an executive officer who shall be known as the director. The director’s term of office shall be coterminous with that of the appointing power, except that the director shall be subject to reappointment.(b) The director shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to the confirmation of the Senate.12100.202. The office shall draft and assist in the preparation, consideration, amendment, and repeal of regulations for a state agency, before the state agency submits a proposed action regarding that regulation to the Office of Administrative Law for publication in the California Regulatory Notice Register, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1.12100.203. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.